Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.100

Community information and involvement plan—Informing home-based, tribal, and family early learning providers of early achievers program.

The department, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall create a community information and involvement plan to inform home-based, tribal, and family early learning providers of the early achievers program under RCW 43.216.085.

[ 2019 c 369 s 14; 2016 c 72 s 701. Formerly RCW 43.215.103.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 369: See note following RCW 43.216.091.

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.